Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-606
Railroad nonoperating property; annual statement by railroad to county assessor; when made.

The county assessor shall assess all nonoperating property of any railroad company. A railroad company operating within the State of Nebraska shall, on or before January 1 of each year, report to the county assessor all nonoperating property belonging to such railroad company.

Laws 1903, c. 73, § 90, p. 417;

R.S.1913, § 6380;

Laws 1921, c. 133, art. VI, § 6, p. 558;

C.S.1922, § 5844;

C.S.1929, § 77-506;

R.S.1943, § 77-606;

Laws 1947, c. 251, § 4, p. 808;

Laws 1969, c. 658, § 2, p. 2576;

Laws 1979, LB 105, § 5;

Laws 1979, LB 103, § 4;

Laws 1985, LB 268, § 8;

Laws 1995, LB 490, § 65;

Laws 1997, LB 270, § 28.